hyph-utf8/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/tex/hyph-kk.tex
% title: Hyphenation patterns for Kazakh (hyph-kk.tex)
% copyright: Copyright (C) 2010 Mojca Miklavec, 2025 Robert Ermers, 2026 Arthur Rosendahl
% notice: This file is part of the hyph-utf8 package.
%     See https://www.hyphenation.org/tex for more information
% authors:
%   - name: Mojca Miklavec
%   - name: Robert Ermers
%   - name: Arthur Rosendahl
% language:
%     name: Kazakh
%     tag: kk
% licence:
%     name: Public domain
% version: 0.1 Date 7 june 2025
% texlive:
%     encoding: t2a
%     babelname: kazakh
%     message: Kazkakh hyphenation patterns
%     description: Hyphenation patterns for Kazakh in T2A and UTF-8 encodings.
% hyphenmins:
%     typesetting:
%         left: 2
%         right: 2
%
% ==========================================
%
% The file has been auto-generated from generate_patterns_kk.rb
% that is part of hyph-utf8.
%
% For more information about UTF-8 hyphenation patterns for TeX and
% links to this file see
%     http://www.tug.org/tex-hyphen/
% 
\patterns{
% Some suffixes are added through a hyphen. When hyphenating these words, a hyphen is added before the hyphen so that the line ends with a hyphen and the new line starts with a hyphen.
1-4
% Allow hyphen after a vowel if and only if there is a single consonant before next the vowel
а1ба
а1бо
а1бұ
а1бы
а1бу
а1бю
а1бя
а1бе
а1бә
а1бі
а1бү
а1бө
а1бё
а1ва
а1во
а1вұ
а1вы
а1ву
а1вю
а1вя
а1ве
а1вә
а1ві
а1вү
а1вө
а1вё
а1га
а1го
а1гұ
а1гы
а1гу
а1гю
а1гя
а1ге
а1гә
а1гі
а1гү
а1гө
а1гё
а1ға
а1ғо
а1ғұ
а1ғы
а1ғу
а1ғю
а1ғя
а1ғе
а1ғә
а1ғі
а1ғү
а1ғө
а1ғё
а1да
а1до
а1дұ
а1ды
а1ду
а1дю
а1дя
а1де
а1дә
а1ді
а1дү
а1дө
а1дё
а1жа
а1жо
а1жұ
а1жы
а1жу
а1жю
а1жя
а1же
а1жә
а1жі
а1жү
а1жө
а1жё
а1за
а1зо
а1зұ
а1зы
а1зу
а1зю
а1зя
а1зе
а1зә
а1зі
а1зү
а1зө
а1зё
а1һа
а1һо
а1һұ
а1һы
а1һу
а1һю
а1һя
а1һе
а1һә
а1һі
а1һү
а1һө
а1һё
а1ка
а1ко
а1кұ
а1кы
а1ку
а1кю
а1кя
а1ке
а1кә
а1кі
а1кү
а1кө
а1кё
а1қа
а1қо
а1құ
а1қы
а1қу
а1қю
а1қя
а1қе
а1қә
а1қі
а1қү
а1қө
а1қё
а1па
а1по
а1пұ
а1пы
а1пу
а1пю
а1пя
а1пе
а1пә
а1пі
а1пү
а1пө
а1пё
а1са
а1со
а1сұ
а1сы
а1су
а1сю
а1ся
а1се
а1сә
а1сі
а1сү
а1сө
а1сё
а1та
а1то
а1тұ
а1ты
а1ту
а1тю
а1тя
а1те
а1тә
а1ті
а1тү
а1тө
а1тё
а1фа
а1фо
а1фұ
а1фы
а1фу
а1фю
а1фя
а1фе
а1фә
а1фі
а1фү
а1фө
а1фё
а1ха
а1хо
а1хұ
а1хы
а1ху
а1хю
а1хя
а1хе
а1хә
а1хі
а1хү
а1хө
а1хё
а1ца
а1цо
а1цұ
а1цы
а1цу
а1цю
а1ця
а1це
а1цә
а1ці
а1цү
а1цө
а1цё
а1ча
а1чо
а1чұ
а1чы
а1чу
а1чю
а1чя
а1че
а1чә
а1чі
а1чү
а1чө
а1чё
а1ша
а1шо
а1шұ
а1шы
а1шу
а1шю
а1шя
а1ше
а1шә
а1ші
а1шү
а1шө
а1шё
а1ща
а1що
а1щұ
а1щы
а1щу
а1щю
а1щя
а1ще
а1щә
а1щі
а1щү
а1щө
а1щё
а1йа
а1йо
а1йұ
а1йы
а1йу
а1йю
а1йя
а1йе
а1йә
а1йі
а1йү
а1йө
а1йё
а1ла
а1ло
а1лұ
а1лы
а1лу
а1лю
а1ля
а1ле
а1лә
а1лі
а1лү
а1лө
а1лё
а1ма
а1мо
а1мұ
а1мы
а1му
а1мю
а1мя
а1ме
а1мә
а1мі
а1мү
а1мө
а1мё
а1на
а1но
а1нұ
а1ны
а1ну
а1ню
а1ня
а1не
а1нә
а1ні
а1нү
а1нө
а1нё
а1ңа
а1ңо
а1ңұ
а1ңы
а1ңу
а1ңю
а1ңя
а1ңе
а1ңә
а1ңі
а1ңү
а1ңө
а1ңё
а1ра
а1ро
а1рұ
а1ры
а1ру
а1рю
а1ря
а1ре
а1рә
а1рі
а1рү
а1рө
а1рё
а1уа
а1уо
а1уұ
а1уы
а1уу
а1ую
а1уя
а1уе
а1уә
а1уі
а1уү
а1уө
а1уё
о1ба
о1бо
о1бұ
о1бы
о1бу
о1бю
о1бя
о1бе
о1бә
о1бі
о1бү
о1бө
о1бё
о1ва
о1во
о1вұ
о1вы
о1ву
о1вю
о1вя
о1ве
о1вә
о1ві
о1вү
о1вө
о1вё
о1га
о1го
о1гұ
о1гы
о1гу
о1гю
о1гя
о1ге
о1гә
о1гі
о1гү
о1гө
о1гё
о1ға
о1ғо
о1ғұ
о1ғы
о1ғу
о1ғю
о1ғя
о1ғе
о1ғә
о1ғі
о1ғү
о1ғө
о1ғё
о1да
о1до
о1дұ
о1ды
о1ду
о1дю
о1дя
о1де
о1дә
о1ді
о1дү
о1дө
о1дё
о1жа
о1жо
о1жұ
о1жы
о1жу
о1жю
о1жя
о1же
о1жә
о1жі
о1жү
о1жө
о1жё
о1за
о1зо
о1зұ
о1зы
о1зу
о1зю
о1зя
о1зе
о1зә
о1зі
о1зү
о1зө
о1зё
о1һа
о1һо
о1һұ
о1һы
о1һу
о1һю
о1һя
о1һе
о1һә
о1һі
о1һү
о1һө
о1һё
о1ка
о1ко
о1кұ
о1кы
о1ку
о1кю
о1кя
о1ке
о1кә
о1кі
о1кү
о1кө
о1кё
о1қа
о1қо
о1құ
о1қы
о1қу
о1қю
о1қя
о1қе
о1қә
о1қі
о1қү
о1қө
о1қё
о1па
о1по
о1пұ
о1пы
о1пу
о1пю
о1пя
о1пе
о1пә
о1пі
о1пү
о1пө
о1пё
о1са
о1со
о1сұ
о1сы
о1су
о1сю
о1ся
о1се
о1сә
о1сі
о1сү
о1сө
о1сё
о1та
о1то
о1тұ
о1ты
о1ту
о1тю
о1тя
о1те
о1тә
о1ті
о1тү
о1тө
о1тё
о1фа
о1фо
о1фұ
о1фы
о1фу
о1фю
о1фя
о1фе
о1фә
о1фі
о1фү
о1фө
о1фё
о1ха
о1хо
о1хұ
о1хы
о1ху
о1хю
о1хя
о1хе
о1хә
о1хі
о1хү
о1хө
о1хё
о1ца
о1цо
о1цұ
о1цы
о1цу
о1цю
о1ця
о1це
о1цә
о1ці
о1цү
о1цө
о1цё
о1ча
о1чо
о1чұ
о1чы
о1чу
о1чю
о1чя
о1че
о1чә
о1чі
о1чү
о1чө
о1чё
о1ша
о1шо
о1шұ
о1шы
о1шу
о1шю
о1шя
о1ше
о1шә
о1ші
о1шү
о1шө
о1шё
о1ща
о1що
о1щұ
о1щы
о1щу
о1щю
о1щя
о1ще
о1щә
о1щі
о1щү
о1щө
о1щё
о1йа
о1йо
о1йұ
о1йы
о1йу
о1йю
о1йя
о1йе
о1йә
о1йі
о1йү
о1йө
о1йё
о1ла
о1ло
о1лұ
о1лы
о1лу
о1лю
о1ля
о1ле
о1лә
о1лі
о1лү
о1лө
о1лё
о1ма
о1мо
о1мұ
о1мы
о1му
о1мю
о1мя
о1ме
о1мә
о1мі
о1мү
о1мө
о1мё
о1на
о1но
о1нұ
о1ны
о1ну
о1ню
о1ня
о1не
о1нә
о1ні
о1нү
о1нө
о1нё
о1ңа
о1ңо
о1ңұ
о1ңы
о1ңу
о1ңю
о1ңя
о1ңе
о1ңә
о1ңі
о1ңү
о1ңө
о1ңё
о1ра
о1ро
о1рұ
о1ры
о1ру
о1рю
о1ря
о1ре
о1рә
о1рі
о1рү
о1рө
о1рё
о1уа
о1уо
о1уұ
о1уы
о1уу
о1ую
о1уя
о1уе
о1уә
о1уі
о1уү
о1уө
о1уё
ұ1ба
ұ1бо
ұ1бұ
ұ1бы
ұ1бу
ұ1бю
ұ1бя
ұ1бе
ұ1бә
ұ1бі
ұ1бү
ұ1бө
ұ1бё
ұ1ва
ұ1во
ұ1вұ
ұ1вы
ұ1ву
ұ1вю
ұ1вя
ұ1ве
ұ1вә
ұ1ві
ұ1вү
ұ1вө
ұ1вё
ұ1га
ұ1го
ұ1гұ
ұ1гы
ұ1гу
ұ1гю
ұ1гя
ұ1ге
ұ1гә
ұ1гі
ұ1гү
ұ1гө
ұ1гё
ұ1ға
ұ1ғо
ұ1ғұ
ұ1ғы
ұ1ғу
ұ1ғю
ұ1ғя
ұ1ғе
ұ1ғә
ұ1ғі
ұ1ғү
ұ1ғө
ұ1ғё
ұ1да
ұ1до
ұ1дұ
ұ1ды
ұ1ду
ұ1дю
ұ1дя
ұ1де
ұ1дә
ұ1ді
ұ1дү
ұ1дө
ұ1дё
ұ1жа
ұ1жо
ұ1жұ
ұ1жы
ұ1жу
ұ1жю
ұ1жя
ұ1же
ұ1жә
ұ1жі
ұ1жү
ұ1жө
ұ1жё
ұ1за
ұ1зо
ұ1зұ
ұ1зы
ұ1зу
ұ1зю
ұ1зя
ұ1зе
ұ1зә
ұ1зі
ұ1зү
ұ1зө
ұ1зё
ұ1һа
ұ1һо
ұ1һұ
ұ1һы
ұ1һу
ұ1һю
ұ1һя
ұ1һе
ұ1һә
ұ1һі
ұ1һү
ұ1һө
ұ1һё
ұ1ка
ұ1ко
ұ1кұ
ұ1кы
ұ1ку
ұ1кю
ұ1кя
ұ1ке
ұ1кә
ұ1кі
ұ1кү
ұ1кө
ұ1кё
ұ1қа
ұ1қо
ұ1құ
ұ1қы
ұ1қу
ұ1қю
ұ1қя
ұ1қе
ұ1қә
ұ1қі
ұ1қү
ұ1қө
ұ1қё
ұ1па
ұ1по
ұ1пұ
ұ1пы
ұ1пу
ұ1пю
ұ1пя
ұ1пе
ұ1пә
ұ1пі
ұ1пү
ұ1пө
ұ1пё
ұ1са
ұ1со
ұ1сұ
ұ1сы
ұ1су
ұ1сю
ұ1ся
ұ1се
ұ1сә
ұ1сі
ұ1сү
ұ1сө
ұ1сё
ұ1та
ұ1то
ұ1тұ
ұ1ты
ұ1ту
ұ1тю
ұ1тя
ұ1те
ұ1тә
ұ1ті
ұ1тү
ұ1тө
ұ1тё
ұ1фа
ұ1фо
ұ1фұ
ұ1фы
ұ1фу
ұ1фю
ұ1фя
ұ1фе
ұ1фә
ұ1фі
ұ1фү
ұ1фө
ұ1фё
ұ1ха
ұ1хо
ұ1хұ
ұ1хы
ұ1ху
ұ1хю
ұ1хя
ұ1хе
ұ1хә
ұ1хі
ұ1хү
ұ1хө
ұ1хё
ұ1ца
ұ1цо
ұ1цұ
ұ1цы
ұ1цу
ұ1цю
ұ1ця
ұ1це
ұ1цә
ұ1ці
ұ1цү
ұ1цө
ұ1цё
ұ1ча
ұ1чо
ұ1чұ
ұ1чы
ұ1чу
ұ1чю
ұ1чя
ұ1че
ұ1чә
ұ1чі
ұ1чү
ұ1чө
ұ1чё
ұ1ша
ұ1шо
ұ1шұ
ұ1шы
ұ1шу
ұ1шю
ұ1шя
ұ1ше
ұ1шә
ұ1ші
ұ1шү
ұ1шө
ұ1шё
ұ1ща
ұ1що
ұ1щұ
ұ1щы
ұ1щу
ұ1щю
ұ1щя
ұ1ще
ұ1щә
ұ1щі
ұ1щү
ұ1щө
ұ1щё
ұ1йа
ұ1йо
ұ1йұ
ұ1йы
ұ1йу
ұ1йю
ұ1йя
ұ1йе
ұ1йә
ұ1йі
ұ1йү
ұ1йө
ұ1йё
ұ1ла
ұ1ло
ұ1лұ
ұ1лы
ұ1лу
ұ1лю
ұ1ля
ұ1ле
ұ1лә
ұ1лі
ұ1лү
ұ1лө
ұ1лё
ұ1ма
ұ1мо
ұ1мұ
ұ1мы
ұ1му
ұ1мю
ұ1мя
ұ1ме
ұ1мә
ұ1мі
ұ1мү
ұ1мө
ұ1мё
ұ1на
ұ1но
ұ1нұ
ұ1ны
ұ1ну
ұ1ню
ұ1ня
ұ1не
ұ1нә
ұ1ні
ұ1нү
ұ1нө
ұ1нё
ұ1ңа
ұ1ңо
ұ1ңұ
ұ1ңы
ұ1ңу
ұ1ңю
ұ1ңя
ұ1ңе
ұ1ңә
ұ1ңі
ұ1ңү
ұ1ңө
ұ1ңё
ұ1ра
ұ1ро
ұ1рұ
ұ1ры
ұ1ру
ұ1рю
ұ1ря
ұ1ре
ұ1рә
ұ1рі
ұ1рү
ұ1рө
ұ1рё
ұ1уа
ұ1уо
ұ1уұ
ұ1уы
ұ1уу
ұ1ую
ұ1уя
ұ1уе
ұ1уә
ұ1уі
ұ1уү
ұ1уө
ұ1уё
ы1ба
ы1бо
ы1бұ
ы1бы
ы1бу
ы1бю
ы1бя
ы1бе
ы1бә
ы1бі
ы1бү
ы1бө
ы1бё
ы1ва
ы1во
ы1вұ
ы1вы
ы1ву
ы1вю
ы1вя
ы1ве
ы1вә
ы1ві
ы1вү
ы1вө
ы1вё
ы1га
ы1го
ы1гұ
ы1гы
ы1гу
ы1гю
ы1гя
ы1ге
ы1гә
ы1гі
ы1гү
ы1гө
ы1гё
ы1ға
ы1ғо
ы1ғұ
ы1ғы
ы1ғу
ы1ғю
ы1ғя
ы1ғе
ы1ғә
ы1ғі
ы1ғү
ы1ғө
ы1ғё
ы1да
ы1до
ы1дұ
ы1ды
ы1ду
ы1дю
ы1дя
ы1де
ы1дә
ы1ді
ы1дү
ы1дө
ы1дё
ы1жа
ы1жо
ы1жұ
ы1жы
ы1жу
ы1жю
ы1жя
ы1же
ы1жә
ы1жі
ы1жү
ы1жө
ы1жё
ы1за
ы1зо
ы1зұ
ы1зы
ы1зу
ы1зю
ы1зя
ы1зе
ы1зә
ы1зі
ы1зү
ы1зө
ы1зё
ы1һа
ы1һо
ы1һұ
ы1һы
ы1һу
ы1һю
ы1һя
ы1һе
ы1һә
ы1һі
ы1һү
ы1һө
ы1һё
ы1ка
ы1ко
ы1кұ
ы1кы
ы1ку
ы1кю
ы1кя
ы1ке
ы1кә
ы1кі
ы1кү
ы1кө
ы1кё
ы1қа
ы1қо
ы1құ
ы1қы
ы1қу
ы1қю
ы1қя
ы1қе
ы1қә
ы1қі
ы1қү
ы1қө
ы1қё
ы1па
ы1по
ы1пұ
ы1пы
ы1пу
ы1пю
ы1пя
ы1пе
ы1пә
ы1пі
ы1пү
ы1пө
ы1пё
ы1са
ы1со
ы1сұ
ы1сы
ы1су
ы1сю
ы1ся
ы1се
ы1сә
ы1сі
ы1сү
ы1сө
ы1сё
ы1та
ы1то
ы1тұ
ы1ты
ы1ту
ы1тю
ы1тя
ы1те
ы1тә
ы1ті
ы1тү
ы1тө
ы1тё
ы1фа
ы1фо
ы1фұ
ы1фы
ы1фу
ы1фю
ы1фя
ы1фе
ы1фә
ы1фі
ы1фү
ы1фө
ы1фё
ы1ха
ы1хо
ы1хұ
ы1хы
ы1ху
ы1хю
ы1хя
ы1хе
ы1хә
ы1хі
ы1хү
ы1хө
ы1хё
ы1ца
ы1цо
ы1цұ
ы1цы
ы1цу
ы1цю
ы1ця
ы1це
ы1цә
ы1ці
ы1цү
ы1цө
ы1цё
ы1ча
ы1чо
ы1чұ
ы1чы
ы1чу
ы1чю
ы1чя
ы1че
ы1чә
ы1чі
ы1чү
ы1чө
ы1чё
ы1ша
ы1шо
ы1шұ
ы1шы
ы1шу
ы1шю
ы1шя
ы1ше
ы1шә
ы1ші
ы1шү
ы1шө
ы1шё
ы1ща
ы1що
ы1щұ
ы1щы
ы1щу
ы1щю
ы1щя
ы1ще
ы1щә
ы1щі
ы1щү
ы1щө
ы1щё
ы1йа
ы1йо
ы1йұ
ы1йы
ы1йу
ы1йю
ы1йя
ы1йе
ы1йә
ы1йі
ы1йү
ы1йө
ы1йё
ы1ла
ы1ло
ы1лұ
ы1лы
ы1лу
ы1лю
ы1ля
ы1ле
ы1лә
ы1лі
ы1лү
ы1лө
ы1лё
ы1ма
ы1мо
ы1мұ
ы1мы
ы1му
ы1мю
ы1мя
ы1ме
ы1мә
ы1мі
ы1мү
ы1мө
ы1мё
ы1на
ы1но
ы1нұ
ы1ны
ы1ну
ы1ню
ы1ня
ы1не
ы1нә
ы1ні
ы1нү
ы1нө
ы1нё
ы1ңа
ы1ңо
ы1ңұ
ы1ңы
ы1ңу
ы1ңю
ы1ңя
ы1ңе
ы1ңә
ы1ңі
ы1ңү
ы1ңө
ы1ңё
ы1ра
ы1ро
ы1рұ
ы1ры
ы1ру
ы1рю
ы1ря
ы1ре
ы1рә
ы1рі
ы1рү
ы1рө
ы1рё
ы1уа
ы1уо
ы1уұ
ы1уы
ы1уу
ы1ую
ы1уя
ы1уе
ы1уә
ы1уі
ы1уү
ы1уө
ы1уё
у1ба
у1бо
у1бұ
у1бы
у1бу
у1бю
у1бя
у1бе
у1бә
у1бі
у1бү
у1бө
у1бё
у1ва
у1во
у1вұ
у1вы
у1ву
у1вю
у1вя
у1ве
у1вә
у1ві
у1вү
у1вө
у1вё
у1га
у1го
у1гұ
у1гы
у1гу
у1гю
у1гя
у1ге
у1гә
у1гі
у1гү
у1гө
у1гё
у1ға
у1ғо
у1ғұ
у1ғы
у1ғу
у1ғю
у1ғя
у1ғе
у1ғә
у1ғі
у1ғү
у1ғө
у1ғё
у1да
у1до
у1дұ
у1ды
у1ду
у1дю
у1дя
у1де
у1дә
у1ді
у1дү
у1дө
у1дё
у1жа
у1жо
у1жұ
у1жы
у1жу
у1жю
у1жя
у1же
у1жә
у1жі
у1жү
у1жө
у1жё
у1за
у1зо
у1зұ
у1зы
у1зу
у1зю
у1зя
у1зе
у1зә
у1зі
у1зү
у1зө
у1зё
у1һа
у1һо
у1һұ
у1һы
у1һу
у1һю
у1һя
у1һе
у1һә
у1һі
у1һү
у1һө
у1һё
у1ка
у1ко
у1кұ
у1кы
у1ку
у1кю
у1кя
у1ке
у1кә
у1кі
у1кү
у1кө
у1кё
у1қа
у1қо
у1құ
у1қы
у1қу
у1қю
у1қя
у1қе
у1қә
у1қі
у1қү
у1қө
у1қё
у1па
у1по
у1пұ
у1пы
у1пу
у1пю
у1пя
у1пе
у1пә
у1пі
у1пү
у1пө
у1пё
у1са
у1со
у1сұ
у1сы
у1су
у1сю
у1ся
у1се
у1сә
у1сі
у1сү
у1сө
у1сё
у1та
у1то
у1тұ
у1ты
у1ту
у1тю
у1тя
у1те
у1тә
у1ті
у1тү
у1тө
у1тё
у1фа
у1фо
у1фұ
у1фы
у1фу
у1фю
у1фя
у1фе
у1фә
у1фі
у1фү
у1фө
у1фё
у1ха
у1хо
у1хұ
у1хы
у1ху
у1хю
у1хя
у1хе
у1хә
у1хі
у1хү
у1хө
у1хё
у1ца
у1цо
у1цұ
у1цы
у1цу
у1цю
у1ця
у1це
у1цә
у1ці
у1цү
у1цө
у1цё
у1ча
у1чо
у1чұ
у1чы
у1чу
у1чю
у1чя
у1че
у1чә
у1чі
у1чү
у1чө
у1чё
у1ша
у1шо
у1шұ
у1шы
у1шу
у1шю
у1шя
у1ше
у1шә
у1ші
у1шү
у1шө
у1шё
у1ща
у1що
у1щұ
у1щы
у1щу
у1щю
у1щя
у1ще
у1щә
у1щі
у1щү
у1щө
у1щё
у1йа
у1йо
у1йұ
у1йы
у1йу
у1йю
у1йя
у1йе
у1йә
у1йі
у1йү
у1йө
у1йё
у1ла
у1ло
у1лұ
у1лы
у1лу
у1лю
у1ля
у1ле
у1лә
у1лі
у1лү
у1лө
у1лё
у1ма
у1мо
у1мұ
у1мы
у1му
у1мю
у1мя
у1ме
у1мә
у1мі
у1мү
у1мө
у1мё
у1на
у1но
у1нұ
у1ны
у1ну
у1ню
у1ня
у1не
у1нә
у1ні
у1нү
у1нө
у1нё
у1ңа
у1ңо
у1ңұ
у1ңы
у1ңу
у1ңю
у1ңя
у1ңе
у1ңә
у1ңі
у1ңү
у1ңө
у1ңё
у1ра
у1ро
у1рұ
у1ры
у1ру
у1рю
у1ря
у1ре
у1рә
у1рі
у1рү
у1рө
у1рё
у1уа
у1уо
у1уұ
у1уы
у1уу
у1ую
у1уя
у1уе
у1уә
у1уі
у1уү
у1уө
у1уё
ю1ба
ю1бо
ю1бұ
ю1бы
ю1бу
ю1бю
ю1бя
ю1бе
ю1бә
ю1бі
ю1бү
ю1бө
ю1бё
ю1ва
ю1во
ю1вұ
ю1вы
ю1ву
ю1вю
ю1вя
ю1ве
ю1вә
ю1ві
ю1вү
ю1вө
ю1вё
ю1га
ю1го
ю1гұ
ю1гы
ю1гу
ю1гю
ю1гя
ю1ге
ю1гә
ю1гі
ю1гү
ю1гө
ю1гё
ю1ға
ю1ғо
ю1ғұ
ю1ғы
ю1ғу
ю1ғю
ю1ғя
ю1ғе
ю1ғә
ю1ғі
ю1ғү
ю1ғө
ю1ғё
ю1да
ю1до
ю1дұ
ю1ды
ю1ду
ю1дю
ю1дя
ю1де
ю1дә
ю1ді
ю1дү
ю1дө
ю1дё
ю1жа
ю1жо
ю1жұ
ю1жы
ю1жу
ю1жю
ю1жя
ю1же
ю1жә
ю1жі
ю1жү
ю1жө
ю1жё
ю1за
ю1зо
ю1зұ
ю1зы
ю1зу
ю1зю
ю1зя
ю1зе
ю1зә
ю1зі
ю1зү
ю1зө
ю1зё
ю1һа
ю1һо
ю1һұ
ю1һы
ю1һу
ю1һю
ю1һя
ю1һе
ю1һә
ю1һі
ю1һү
ю1һө
ю1һё
ю1ка
ю1ко
ю1кұ
ю1кы
ю1ку
ю1кю
ю1кя
ю1ке
ю1кә
ю1кі
ю1кү
ю1кө
ю1кё
ю1қа
ю1қо
ю1құ
ю1қы
ю1қу
ю1қю
ю1қя
ю1қе
ю1қә
ю1қі
ю1қү
ю1қө
ю1қё
ю1па
ю1по
ю1пұ
ю1пы
ю1пу
ю1пю
ю1пя
ю1пе
ю1пә
ю1пі
ю1пү
ю1пө
ю1пё
ю1са
ю1со
ю1сұ
ю1сы
ю1су
ю1сю
ю1ся
ю1се
ю1сә
ю1сі
ю1сү
ю1сө
ю1сё
ю1та
ю1то
ю1тұ
ю1ты
ю1ту
ю1тю
ю1тя
ю1те
ю1тә
ю1ті
ю1тү
ю1тө
ю1тё
ю1фа
ю1фо
ю1фұ
ю1фы
ю1фу
ю1фю
ю1фя
ю1фе
ю1фә
ю1фі
ю1фү
ю1фө
ю1фё
ю1ха
ю1хо
ю1хұ
ю1хы
ю1ху
ю1хю
ю1хя
ю1хе
ю1хә
ю1хі
ю1хү
ю1хө
ю1хё
ю1ца
ю1цо
ю1цұ
ю1цы
ю1цу
ю1цю
ю1ця
ю1це
ю1цә
ю1ці
ю1цү
ю1цө
ю1цё
ю1ча
ю1чо
ю1чұ
ю1чы
ю1чу
ю1чю
ю1чя
ю1че
ю1чә
ю1чі
ю1чү
ю1чө
ю1чё
ю1ша
ю1шо
ю1шұ
ю1шы
ю1шу
ю1шю
ю1шя
ю1ше
ю1шә
ю1ші
ю1шү
ю1шө
ю1шё
ю1ща
ю1що
ю1щұ
ю1щы
ю1щу
ю1щю
ю1щя
ю1ще
ю1щә
ю1щі
ю1щү
ю1щө
ю1щё
ю1йа
ю1йо
ю1йұ
ю1йы
ю1йу
ю1йю
ю1йя
ю1йе
ю1йә
ю1йі
ю1йү
ю1йө
ю1йё
ю1ла
ю1ло
ю1лұ
ю1лы
ю1лу
ю1лю
ю1ля
ю1ле
ю1лә
ю1лі
ю1лү
ю1лө
ю1лё
ю1ма
ю1мо
ю1мұ
ю1мы
ю1му
ю1мю
ю1мя
ю1ме
ю1мә
ю1мі
ю1мү
ю1мө
ю1мё
ю1на
ю1но
ю1нұ
ю1ны
ю1ну
ю1ню
ю1ня
ю1не
ю1нә
ю1ні
ю1нү
ю1нө
ю1нё
ю1ңа
ю1ңо
ю1ңұ
ю1ңы
ю1ңу
ю1ңю
ю1ңя
ю1ңе
ю1ңә
ю1ңі
ю1ңү
ю1ңө
ю1ңё
ю1ра
ю1ро
ю1рұ
ю1ры
ю1ру
ю1рю
ю1ря
ю1ре
ю1рә
ю1рі
ю1рү
ю1рө
ю1рё
ю1уа
ю1уо
ю1уұ
ю1уы
ю1уу
ю1ую
ю1уя
ю1уе
ю1уә
ю1уі
ю1уү
ю1уө
ю1уё
я1ба
я1бо
я1бұ
я1бы
я1бу
я1бю
я1бя
я1бе
я1бә
я1бі
я1бү
я1бө
я1бё
я1ва
я1во
я1вұ
я1вы
я1ву
я1вю
я1вя
я1ве
я1вә
я1ві
я1вү
я1вө
я1вё
я1га
я1го
я1гұ
я1гы
я1гу
я1гю
я1гя
я1ге
я1гә
я1гі
я1гү
я1гө
я1гё
я1ға
я1ғо
я1ғұ
я1ғы
я1ғу
я1ғю
я1ғя
я1ғе
я1ғә
я1ғі
я1ғү
я1ғө
я1ғё
я1да
я1до
я1дұ
я1ды
я1ду
я1дю
я1дя
я1де
я1дә
я1ді
я1дү
я1дө
я1дё
я1жа
я1жо
я1жұ
я1жы
я1жу
я1жю
я1жя
я1же
я1жә
я1жі
я1жү
я1жө
я1жё
я1за
я1зо
я1зұ
я1зы
я1зу
я1зю
я1зя
я1зе
я1зә
я1зі
я1зү
я1зө
я1зё
я1һа
я1һо
я1һұ
я1һы
я1һу
я1һю
я1һя
я1һе
я1һә
я1һі
я1һү
я1һө
я1һё
я1ка
я1ко
я1кұ
я1кы
я1ку
я1кю
я1кя
я1ке
я1кә
я1кі
